District of Columbia statutes.
22-2802

Attempt to commit robbery.

Whoever attempts to commit robbery, as defined in § 22-2801, by an overt act, shall be imprisoned for not more than 3 years or be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 811
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(e), 60 DCR 2064
Armed offenses, additional penalty for committing crime when armed, see §§ 22-4501 and 22-4502.
1981 Ed., § 22-2902.
1973 Ed., § 22-2902.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(e) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.